New York, session 2025-2026, S1148.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "rider representation act". 3 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 1263 of the public 4 authorities law, as amended by chapter 549 of the laws of 1994, subpara- 5 graph 1 as amended by chapter 68 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 6 as follows: 7 (a) (1) There is hereby created the "metropolitan transportation 8 authority." The authority shall be a body corporate and politic consti- 9 tuting a public benefit corporation. The authority shall consist of a 10 chairperson, [sixteen] twenty other voting members, and [two] one non- 11 voting and [four] two alternate non-voting members, as described in 12 subparagraph two of this paragraph appointed by the governor by and with 13 the advice and consent of the senate. Any member appointed to a term 14 commencing on or after June thirtieth, two thousand nine shall have 15 experience in one or more of the following areas: transportation, public 16 administration, business management, finance, accounting, law, engineer- 17 ing, land use, urban and regional planning, management of large capital 18 projects, labor relations, or have experience in some other area of 19 activity central to the mission of the authority. Four of the sixteen 20 voting members other than the chairperson shall be appointed on the 21 written recommendation of the mayor of the city of New York; one of the 22 twenty voting members other than the chairperson shall be appointed on EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01670-01-5 S. 1148 2 1 the written recommendation of the New York city transit authority advi- 2 sory council; one of the twenty voting members other than the chair- 3 person shall be appointed on the written recommendation of the Metro- 4 North rail commuter council; one of the twenty voting members other than 5 the chairperson shall be appointed on the written recommendation of the 6 Long Island Rail Road commuter's council; one of the twenty voting 7 members other than the chairperson shall be appointed on the written 8 recommendation of the commissioner of the New York city mayor's office 9 for people with disabilities, as such office is defined in section 10 22-301 of the administrative code of the city of New York, provided that 11 such commissioner shall consult with disability advisory bodies to the 12 authority and external disability advocacy organizations when making 13 such appointment; and each of seven other voting members other than the 14 chairperson shall be appointed after selection from a written list of 15 three recommendations from the chief executive officer of the county in 16 which the particular member is required to reside pursuant to the 17 provisions of this subdivision. Of the members appointed on recommenda- 18 tion of the chief executive officer of a county, one such member shall 19 be, at the time of appointment, a resident of the county of Nassau, one 20 a resident of the county of Suffolk, one a resident of the county of 21 Westchester, one a resident of the county of Dutchess, one a resident of 22 the county of Orange, one a resident of the county of Putnam and one a 23 resident of the county of Rockland, provided that the term of any member 24 who is a resident of a county that has withdrawn from the metropolitan 25 commuter transportation district pursuant to section twelve hundred 26 seventy-nine-b of this title shall terminate upon the effective date of 27 such county's withdrawal from such district. Of the five voting members, 28 other than the chairperson, appointed by the governor without recommen- 29 dation from any other person, three shall be, at the time of appoint- 30 ment, residents of the city of New York and two shall be, at the time of 31 appointment, residents of such city or of any of the aforementioned 32 counties in the metropolitan commuter transportation district. Provided 33 however, notwithstanding the foregoing residency requirement, one of the 34 five voting members appointed by the governor without recommendation 35 from any other person, other than the chairperson, may be the director 36 of the New York state division of the budget, and provided further that, 37 in the event of such appointment, the budget director's membership in 38 the authority shall be deemed ex-officio. Provided further, one of the 39 twelve voting members, other than the chairperson, appointed by the 40 governor without recommendation by any other person, or on the recommen- 41 dation of the mayor of the city of New York, or of the chief executive 42 officer of the counties of Westchester, Nassau, or Suffolk shall be a 43 transit dependent individual. A "transit dependent individual" shall 44 mean an individual who is limited to public transit as their primary 45 mode of transportation because the individual has a permanent disabili- 46 ty, provided that any local or statewide transit advocacy organization 47 may recommend one or more transit dependent individuals to be considered 48 for appointment pursuant to this section. The chairperson and each of 49 the members shall be appointed for a term of six years, provided howev- 50 er, that the chairperson first appointed shall serve for a term ending 51 June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-one, provided that thirty days 52 after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand nine 53 which amended this subparagraph, the term of the chairperson shall 54 expire; provided, further, that such chairperson may continue to 55 discharge the duties of [his or her] their office until the position of 56 chairperson is filled by appointment by the governor upon the advice and S. 1148 3 1 consent of the senate and the term of such new chairperson shall termi- 2 nate June thirtieth, two thousand fifteen. [The sixteen] Sixteen of the 3 other members first appointed shall serve for the following terms: The 4 members from the counties of Nassau and Westchester shall each serve for 5 a term ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-five; the members 6 from the county of Suffolk and from the counties of Dutchess, Orange, 7 Putnam and Rockland shall each serve for a term ending June thirtieth, 8 nineteen hundred ninety-two; two of the members appointed on recommenda- 9 tion of the mayor of the city of New York shall each serve for a term 10 ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-four and, two shall each 11 serve for a term ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-one; two 12 of the members appointed by the governor without the recommendation of 13 any other person shall each serve for a term ending June thirtieth, 14 nineteen hundred eighty-two, two shall each serve for a term ending June 15 thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty and one shall serve for a term ending 16 June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-five. [The two non-voting and 17 four alternate non-voting members shall serve until January first, two 18 thousand one.] The members from the counties of Dutchess, Orange, Putnam 19 and Rockland shall cast one collective vote. 20 (2) There shall be [two] one non-voting [members] member and [four] 21 two alternate non-voting members of the authority, as referred to in 22 subparagraph one of this paragraph. 23 The first non-voting member shall be [a regular mass transit user of 24 the facilities of the authority and be recommended to the governor by 25 the New York city transit authority advisory council. The first alter- 26 nate non-voting member shall be a regular mass transit user of the 27 facilities of the authority and be recommended to the governor by the 28 Metro-North commuter council. The second alternate non-voting member 29 shall be a regular mass transit user of the facilities of the authority 30 and be recommended to the governor by the Long Island Rail Road 31 commuter's council. 32 The second non-voting member shall be] recommended to the governor by 33 the labor organization representing the majority of employees of the 34 Long Island Rail Road. The [third] first alternate non-voting member 35 shall be recommended to the governor by the labor organization repres- 36 enting the majority of employees of the New York city transit authority. 37 The [fourth] second alternate non-voting member shall be recommended to 38 the governor by the labor organization representing the majority of 39 employees of the Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company. The [chairman] 40 chairperson of the authority, at [his] their direction, may exclude 41 [such] any non-voting member or alternate non-voting member from attend- 42 ing any portion of a meeting of the authority or of any committee estab- 43 lished pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision four of this section 44 held for the purpose of discussing negotiations with labor organiza- 45 tions. 46 [The non-voting member and the two alternate non-voting members 47 representing the New York York city transit authority advisory council, 48 the Metro-North commuter council, and the Long Island Rail Road 49 commuter's council shall serve eighteen month rotating terms, after 50 which time an alternate non-voting member shall become the non-voting 51 member and the rotation shall continue until each alternate member has 52 served at least one eighteen month term as a non-voting member.] The 53 [other] non-voting member and alternate non-voting members representing 54 the New York city transit authority, Metro-North Commuter Railroad 55 Company, and the Long Island Rail Road labor organizations shall serve 56 eighteen month rotating terms, after which time an alternate non-voting S. 1148 4 1 member shall become the non-voting member and the rotation shall contin- 2 ue until each alternate member has served at least one eighteen month 3 term as a non-voting member. [The transit authority and the commuter 4 railroads shall not be represented concurrently by the two non-voting 5 members during any such eighteen month period.] 6 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 1263 of the public 7 authorities law, as amended by section 2 of part E of chapter 39 of the 8 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 9 (a) There is hereby created the "metropolitan transportation authori- 10 ty." The authority shall be a body corporate and politic constituting a 11 public benefit corporation. The authority shall consist of a [chairman] 12 chairperson and [sixteen] twenty other members appointed by the governor 13 by and with the advice and consent of the senate. Any member appointed 14 to a term commencing on or after June thirtieth, two thousand nine shall 15 have experience in one or more of the following areas of expertise: 16 transportation, public administration, business management, finance, 17 accounting, law, engineering, land use, urban and regional planning, 18 management of large capital projects, labor relations, or have experi- 19 ence in some other area of activity central to the mission of the 20 authority. Four of the [sixteen] twenty members other than the [chair- 21 man] chairperson shall be appointed on the written recommendation of the 22 mayor of the city of New York; one of the twenty voting members other 23 than the chairperson shall be appointed on the written recommendation of 24 the New York city transit authority advisory council; one of the twenty 25 voting members other than the chairperson shall be appointed on the 26 written recommendation of the Metro-North rail commuter council; one of 27 the twenty voting members other than the chairperson shall be appointed 28 on the written recommendation of the Long Island Rail Road commuter's 29 council; one of the twenty voting members other than the chairperson 30 shall be appointed on the written recommendation of the commissioner of 31 the New York city mayor's office for people with disabilities, as such 32 office is defined in section 22-1301 of the administrative code of the 33 city of New York, provided that such commissioner shall consult with 34 disability advisory bodies to the authority and external disability 35 advocacy organizations when making such appointment; and each of seven 36 other members other than the [chairman] chairperson shall be appointed 37 after selection from a written list of three recommendations from the 38 chief executive officer of the county in which the particular member is 39 required to reside pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision. Of 40 the members appointed on recommendation of the chief executive officer 41 of a county, one such member shall be, at the time of appointment, a 42 resident of the county of Nassau; one a resident of the county of 43 Suffolk; one a resident of the county of Westchester; and one a resident 44 of the county of Dutchess, one a resident of the county of Orange, one a 45 resident of the county of Putnam and one a resident of the county of 46 Rockland, provided that the term of any member who is a resident of a 47 county that has withdrawn from the metropolitan commuter transportation 48 district pursuant to section twelve hundred seventy-nine-b of this title 49 shall terminate upon the effective date of such county's withdrawal from 50 such district. Of the five members, other than the [chairman] chair- 51 person, appointed by the governor without recommendation from any other 52 person, three shall be, at the time of appointment, residents of the 53 city of New York and two shall be, at the time of appointment, residents 54 of such city or of any of the aforementioned counties in the metropol- 55 itan commuter transportation district. Provided however, notwithstanding 56 the foregoing residency requirement, one of the five voting members S. 1148 5 1 appointed by the governor without recommendation from any other person, 2 other than the [chairman] chairperson, may be the director of the New 3 York state division of the budget, and provided further that, in the 4 event of such appointment, the budget director's membership in the 5 authority shall be deemed ex-officio. The [chairman] chairperson and 6 each of the members shall be appointed for a term of six years, provided 7 however, that the [chairman] chairperson first appointed shall serve for 8 a term ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-one, provided that 9 thirty days after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two 10 thousand nine which amended this paragraph, the term of the [chairman] 11 chairperson shall expire; provided, further, that such [chairman] chair- 12 person may continue to discharge the duties of [his] their office until 13 the position of [chairman] chairperson is filled by appointment by the 14 governor upon the advice and consent of the senate and the term of such 15 new [chairman] chairperson shall terminate June thirtieth, two thousand 16 fifteen. [The sixteen] Sixteen of the other members first appointed 17 shall serve for the following terms: The members from the counties of 18 Nassau and Westchester shall each serve for a term ending June thirti- 19 eth, nineteen hundred eighty-five; the members from the county of 20 Suffolk and from the counties of Dutchess, Orange, Putnam and Rockland 21 shall each serve for a term ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred 22 ninety-two; two of the members appointed on recommendation of the mayor 23 of the city of New York shall each serve for a term ending June thirti- 24 eth, nineteen hundred eighty-four and, two shall each serve for a term 25 ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-one; two of the members 26 appointed by the governor without the recommendation of any other person 27 shall each serve for a term ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred 28 eighty-two, two shall each serve for a term ending June thirtieth, nine- 29 teen hundred eighty and one shall serve for a term ending June thirti- 30 eth, nineteen hundred eighty-five. The members from the counties of 31 Dutchess, Orange, Putnam and Rockland shall cast one collective vote. 32 § 4. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 1263 of the public 33 authorities law, as added by section 3 of subpart B of part ZZZ of chap- 34 ter 59 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 35 (c) (i) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, 36 the term of any voting member shall expire upon the expiration of the 37 term in office being served by the county elected official upon whose 38 recommendation they were appointed; provided, however, that in such 39 circumstance such member may serve as a holdover appointee for sixty 40 days, or until such time as a new member is appointed, whichever is 41 less. The term of any member appointed to replace such a holdover 42 appointee shall expire at the end of the term in office of the county 43 elected official upon whose recommendation such member was appointed. If 44 a county elected official leaves office because of death, resignation, 45 removal or disability, however, a member appointed upon such official's 46 recommendation shall continue to serve until such time as such county 47 elected office is filled, at which time such member will become a hold- 48 over appointee and may serve for sixty days, or until such time as a new 49 member is appointed, whichever is less. 50 (ii) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, the 51 term of any [chairman] chairperson or any voting member shall expire 52 upon the expiration of the term in office being served by the city or 53 state elected official upon whose recommendation they were appointed; 54 provided, however, that in such circumstance the [chairman] chairperson 55 or such member may serve as a holdover appointee until such time as a 56 new [chairman] chairperson or member is appointed. The term of any S. 1148 6 1 [chairman] chairperson or member appointed to replace such a holdover 2 appointee shall expire at the end of the term in office of the city or 3 state elected official upon whose recommendation such [chairman] chair- 4 person or member was appointed. 5 (iii) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, the 6 term of the voting member appointed on the written recommendation of the 7 commissioner of the New York city mayor's office for people with disa- 8 bilities shall expire upon the expiration of the term in office being 9 served by the mayor of the city of New York; provided, however, that in 10 such circumstance such member may serve as a holdover appointee for 11 sixty days, or until such time as a new member is appointed, whichever 12 is sooner. The term of any member appointed to replace such holdover 13 appointee shall expire at the end of the term in office of the mayor of 14 the city of New York. 15 (iv) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to the voting 16 members appointed on the written recommendations of the New York city 17 transit authority advisory council, the Metro-North rail commuter coun- 18 cil, the Long Island Rail Road commuter's council, as described in para- 19 graph (a) of subdivision one of this section. 20 § 5. Subdivision 2 of section 1263 of the public authorities law, as 21 amended by chapter 55 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 2. The [chairman] chairperson and the first vice [chairman] chair- 24 person shall be paid a salary in the amount determined by the authority; 25 the other members shall not receive a salary or other compensation. Each 26 member, including the [chairman] chairperson and the first vice [chair- 27 man] chairperson, shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and 28 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of [his or her] their 29 official duties. 30 § 6. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 1263 of the public 31 authorities law, as amended by chapter 506 of the laws of 2009, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the [chair- 34 man] chairperson shall be the chief executive officer of the authority 35 and shall be responsible for the discharge of the executive and adminis- 36 trative functions and powers of the authority. The [chairman] chair- 37 person may appoint an executive director and such other officials and 38 employees as shall in [his or her] their judgment be needed to discharge 39 the executive and administrative functions and powers of the authority. 40 § 7. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 1263 of the public 41 authorities law, as amended by section 1 of chapter 425 of the laws of 42 2018, is amended to read as follows: 43 (b) The [chairman] chairperson shall establish committees to assist 44 [him] them in the performance of [his] their duties and shall appoint 45 members of the authority to such committees. Among such committees, 46 there shall be a committee on operations of the New York city transit 47 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface transit operating authority 48 and the Staten Island rapid transit operating authority; a committee on 49 operations of the Long Island Rail Road and the metropolitan suburban 50 bus authority; a committee on operations of the Metro-North commuter 51 railroad; a committee on operations of the Triborough bridge and tunnel 52 authority; a committee on finance; a committee on capital program over- 53 sight; and a committee on safety. In addition to such appointed members, 54 each of the [non-voting] members recommended by the New York city trans- 55 it authority advisory council, the Metro-North rail commuter council, 56 and the Long Island Rail Road commuter's council referred to in [subpar- S. 1148 7 1 agraph two of] paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section shall 2 serve on the committee on capital program oversight, the committee on 3 finance, the committee on safety, the committee on operations of the 4 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority, and the operations committee 5 relevant to the commuter council that recommended such member. [The 6 alternate non-voting members shall each serve on the respective oper- 7 ations committee relevant to the commuter council that recommended each 8 member.] The committee on capital program oversight and the committee on 9 safety shall include not less than three members, and shall include the 10 chairpersons of the committee on operations of the New York city transit 11 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface transit operating authority 12 and the Staten Island rapid transit operating authority, the committee 13 on operations of the Long Island Rail Road and the metropolitan suburban 14 bus authority, and the committee on operations of the Metro-North commu- 15 ter railroad. The committee on safety shall convene at least once annu- 16 ally and each committee chairperson, that is a member of the committee 17 on safety, shall report to the committee on safety any and all initi- 18 atives, concerns, improvements, or failures involving the safety of: (1) 19 customers; (2) employees; and (3) the public at large, in relation to 20 authority facilities and services. The capital program committee shall, 21 with respect to any approved or proposed capital program plans, (i) 22 monitor the current and future availability of funds to be utilized for 23 such plans approved or proposed to be submitted to the metropolitan 24 transportation capital program review board as provided in section 25 twelve hundred sixty-nine-b of this title; (ii) monitor the contract 26 awards of the metropolitan transportation authority and the New York 27 city transit authority to insure that such awards are consistent with 28 (A) provisions of law authorizing United States content and New York 29 state content; (B) collective bargaining agreements; (C) provisions of 30 law providing for participation by minority and women-owned businesses; 31 (D) New York state labor laws; (E) competitive bidding requirements 32 including those regarding sole source contracts; and (F) any other rele- 33 vant requirements established by law; (iii) monitor the award of 34 contracts to determine if such awards are consistent with the manner in 35 which the work was traditionally performed in the past provided, howev- 36 er, that any such determination shall not be admissible as evidence in 37 any arbitration or judicial proceeding; (iv) review the relationship 38 between capital expenditures pursuant to each such capital program plan 39 and current and future operating budget requirements; (v) monitor the 40 progress of capital elements described in each capital program plan 41 approved as provided in section twelve hundred sixty-nine-b of this 42 title; (vi) monitor the expenditures incurred and to be incurred for 43 each such element; and (vii) identify capital elements not progressing 44 on schedule, ascertain responsibility therefor and recommend those 45 actions required or appropriate to accelerate their implementation. The 46 capital program committee shall issue a quarterly report on its activ- 47 ities and findings, and shall in connection with the preparation of such 48 quarterly report, consult with the state division of the budget, the 49 state department of transportation, the members of the metropolitan 50 transportation authority capital program review board, and any other 51 group the committee deems relevant, including public employee organiza- 52 tions, and, at least annually, with a nationally recognized independent 53 transit engineering firm. Such report shall be made available to the 54 members of the authority, to the members of the metropolitan transporta- 55 tion authority capital program review board, and the directors of the 56 municipal assistance corporation for the city of New York. S. 1148 8 1 § 8. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 1263 of the public 2 authorities law, as amended by section 2 of chapter 425 of the laws of 3 2018, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) The [chairman] chairperson shall establish committees to assist 5 [him] them in the performance of [his] their duties and shall appoint 6 members of the authority to such committees. Among such committees, 7 there shall be a committee on operations of the New York city transit 8 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface transit operating authority 9 and the Staten Island rapid transit operating authority; a committee on 10 operations of the Long Island Rail Road and the metropolitan suburban 11 bus authority; a committee on operations of the Metro-North commuter 12 railroad; a committee on operations of the Triborough bridge and tunnel 13 authority; a committee on finance; a committee on capital program over- 14 sight; and a committee on safety. The committee on capital program over- 15 sight shall include not less than four members, and shall include the 16 chairpersons of the committee on operations of the New York city transit 17 authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface transit operating authority 18 and the Staten Island rapid transit operating authority, the committee 19 on operations of the Long Island Rail Road and the metropolitan suburban 20 bus authority, the committee on operations of the Metro-North commuter 21 railroad, and the committee on safety. The committee on safety shall 22 convene at least once annually and each committee chairperson, that is a 23 member of the committee on safety, shall report to the committee on 24 safety any and all initiatives, concerns, improvements, or failures 25 involving the safety of: (1) customers; (2) employees; and (3) the 26 public at large, in relation to authority facilities and services. The 27 capital program committee shall, with respect to any approved or 28 proposed capital program plans, (i) monitor the current and future 29 availability of funds to be utilized for such plans approved or proposed 30 to be submitted to the metropolitan transportation capital program 31 review board as provided in section twelve hundred sixty-nine-b of this 32 title; (ii) monitor the contract awards of the metropolitan transporta- 33 tion authority and the New York city transit authority to insure that 34 such awards are consistent with (A) provisions of law authorizing United 35 States content and New York state content; (B) collective bargaining 36 agreements; (C) provisions of law providing for participation by minori- 37 ty and women-owned businesses; (D) New York state labor laws; (E) 38 competitive bidding requirements including those regarding sole source 39 contracts; and (F) any other relevant requirements established by law; 40 (iii) monitor the award of contracts to determine if such awards are 41 consistent with the manner in which the work was traditionally performed 42 in the past provided, however, that any such determination shall not be 43 admissible as evidence in any arbitration or judicial proceeding; (iv) 44 review the relationship between capital expenditures pursuant to each 45 such capital program plan and current and future operating budget 46 requirements; (v) monitor the progress of capital elements described in 47 each capital program plan approved as provided in section twelve hundred 48 sixty-nine-b of this title; (vi) monitor the expenditures incurred and 49 to be incurred for each such element; and (vii) identify capital 50 elements not progressing on schedule, ascertain responsibility therefor 51 and recommend those actions required or appropriate to accelerate their 52 implementation. The capital program committee shall issue a quarterly 53 report on its activities and findings, and shall in connection with the 54 preparation of such quarterly report, consult with the state division of 55 the budget, the state department of transportation, the members of the 56 metropolitan transportation authority capital program review board and S. 1148 9 1 any other group the committee deems relevant, including public employee 2 organizations, and, at least annually, with a nationally recognized 3 independent transit engineering firm. Such report shall be made avail- 4 able to the members of the authority, to the members of the metropolitan 5 transportation authority capital program review board, and the directors 6 of the municipal assistance corporation for the city of New York. 7 § 9. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subdivision 4 of section 1263 of the 8 public authorities law, paragraph (c) as added by chapter 247 of the 9 laws of 1990, paragraph (d) as added by section 5 of part H of chapter 10 25 of the laws of 2009, are amended to read as follows: 11 (c) The [chairman] chairperson shall ensure that at every meeting of 12 the board and at every meeting of each committee the public shall be 13 allotted a period of time, not less than thirty minutes, to speak on any 14 topic on the agenda. 15 (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of subdivision one of section twen- 16 ty-eight hundred twenty-four of this chapter or any other provision of 17 law to the contrary, the [chairman] chairperson shall not participate in 18 establishing authority policies regarding the payment of salary, compen- 19 sation, and reimbursement to, nor establish rules for the time and 20 attendance of, the chief executive officer. The salary of the [chairman] 21 chairperson, as determined pursuant to subdivision two of this section, 22 shall also be compensation for all services performed as chief executive 23 officer. 24 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 25 ments to paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 1263 of the public 26 authorities law made by section two of this act shall be subject to the 27 expiration and reversion of such paragraph pursuant to section 3 of 28 chapter 549 of the laws of 1994, as amended, when upon such date the 29 provisions of section three of this act shall take effect; and provided 30 further that the amendments to paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 31 1263 of the public authorities law made by section seven of this act 32 shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of such subdivision 33 pursuant to section 3 of chapter 549 of the laws of 1994, as amended, 34 when upon such date the provisions of section eight of this act shall 35 take effect.